Utah statutes.
19-7-106.   In camera review -- Burden of proof.
(1)  The person seeking disclosure of an environmental audit report shall
request an in camera review of the audit report by a court of record.
(2) (a)  If a court of record determines through in camera review that all or
part of an environmental audit report is not privileged, the court shall order
the disclosure of the nonprivileged portions of the environmental audit
report.
(b)  The privileged portions of the environmental audit report may not be
disclosed.
(3)  The person asserting the environmental self-evaluation privilege has the
burden of establishing a prima facie case of privilege.
(4)  The person seeking disclosure of an environmental audit report has the
burden of proving that the environmental audit report is not privileged or
excepted pursuant to the Utah Rules of Evidence, Rule 508.
